Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.260

Quieting title to tax-title property—Form of deed on sale after title quieted.

That in all cases where any county of the state of Washington has perfected title to real estate owned by the county, under the provisions of RCW 36.35.160 through 36.35.270 and resells the same or part thereof, it shall give to the purchaser a warranty deed in substantially the following form:

STATE OF WASHINGTON











ss.

County of. . . .

This indenture, made this . . . . day of . . . . . . . . (year) . ., between . . . . . . as treasurer of . . . . . . county, state of Washington, the party of the first part, and . . . . . ., party of the second part.

WITNESSETH, THAT WHEREAS, at a public sale of real property, held on the . . . . day of . . . . . . . . (year) . ., pursuant to an order of the county legislative authority of the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, duly made and entered, and after having first given due notice of the time and place and terms of the sale, and, whereas, in pursuance of the order of the county legislative authority, and of the laws of the state of Washington, and for and in consideration of the sum of . . . . . . dollars, lawful money of the United States of America, to me in hand paid, the receipt whereof is hereby acknowledged, I have this day sold to . . . . . . the following described real property, and which the real property is the property of . . . . . . county, and which is particularly described as follows, to wit:

. . . . . ., the . . . . . . being the highest and best bidder at the sale, and the sum being the highest and best sum bid at the sale:

NOW THEREFORE KNOW YE that I, . . . . . . county treasurer of the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in consideration of the premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of Washington, in such cases made and provided, do hereby grant, convey and warrant on behalf of . . . . . . county unto . . . . . ., his or her heirs and assigns, forever, the real property hereinbefore described.

Given under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of . . . . . . , . . (year) . .

. . . .

County Treasurer.

By

. . . .

Deputy.

[ 1998 c 106 s 20; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.430. Prior: 1929 c 197 s 1; RRS s 11308-11. Formerly RCW 84.64.430.]